Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5059YH (3) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2079 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13H Extracurricular 1 interscholastic athletic contests or competitions ââ acceptance 2 of legal tender required. 3 1. For purposes of this section, âorganizationâ means the 4 same as defined in section 280.13. 5 2. A public school shall accept legal tender as a form of 6 payment for entry into any extracurricular interscholastic 7 athletic contest or competition sponsored by an organization. 8 As a condition of registration with the department of education 9 under section 280.13 , an organization shall accept legal 10 tender as a form of payment for entry into any extracurricular 11 interscholastic athletic contest or competition sponsored by 12 the organization. 13